Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.010

Rights, powers, and privileges.

Every town shall be entitled the "Town of . . . . . . . . ." (naming it), and by such name shall have perpetual succession, may sue, and be sued in all courts and places, and in all proceedings whatever; shall have and use a common seal, alterable at the pleasure of the town authorities, and may purchase, lease, receive, hold, and enjoy real and personal property and control, lease, sublease, convey, or otherwise dispose of the same for the common benefit.

[ 1994 c 273 s 11; 1994 c 81 s 53; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.010. Prior: 1890 p 198 s 142; RRS s 9163.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 81 s 53 and by 1994 c 273 s 11, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).